District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

24-201.44

New housing or facilities; rated design capacity

Repealed.

Nov. 14, 1987, D.C. Law 7-43, § 5, 34 DCR 5287
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 1802(b), 50 DCR 5668
Jan. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-62, § 7, 50 DCR 6574
1981 Ed., § 24-904.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1802(b) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1802(b) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).